Utah statutes.
59-13-402.   Revenue from taxes deposited with treasurer -- Credit to
Aeronautics Restricted Account -- Purposes for which funds may be used --
Allocation of funds -- Reports -- Returns required.
(1) (a)  All revenue received by the commission under this part shall be
deposited daily with the state treasurer who shall credit all of the revenue
collected to the Transportation Fund.
(b)  An appropriation from the Transportation Fund shall be made to the
commission to cover expenses incurred in the administration and enforcement of
this part and the collection of the aviation fuel tax.
(c)  Refunds to which taxpayers are entitled under this part shall be paid
from the Transportation Fund.
(2)  The state treasurer shall place an amount equal to the total amount
received from the sale or use of aviation fuel in the Aeronautics Restricted
Account created by Section 72-2-126.
(3)  The tax imposed on each gallon of aviation fuel under Section 59-13-401
shall be allocated to the airport where the aviation fuel was sold and to
aeronautical operations of the Department of Transportation as follows:
          Total       Allocation to        Allocation to
          Tax         Airport              Aeronautical
          Allocated                        Operations
(a)  Tax on Each Gallon of Aviation
Fuel Purchased for Use by a Federally
Certificated Air Carrier Other than at
an International Airport Located Within a
County of the First Class that has a United
States Customs Office on its Premises           $.04            $.03
$.01
(b)  Tax on Each Gallon of Aviation
Fuel Purchased for Use by a Certificated
Air Carrier at an International Airport
Located Within a County of the First
Class that has a United States Customs
Office on its Premises                          $.025           $.015
$.01
(c)  Tax on Each Gallon of Aviation
Fuel Purchased for Use by a Person Other
than a Federally Certificated Air Carrier
at an International Airport Located Within a
County of the First Class that has a United
States Customs Office on its Premises           $.09            $.00
$.09
(d)  Tax on Each Gallon of Aviation
Fuel Purchased for Use by a Person Other
than a Federally Certificated Air Carrier
Other than at an International Airport
Located Within a County of the First
Class that has a United States Customs
Office on its Premises                          $.09            $.03
$.06
(e)  The allocation to the publicly used airport may be used at the discretion
of the airport's governing authority for the:
(i)  construction, improvements, operation, and maintenance of publicly used
airports in the state; and
(ii)  payment of principal and interest on indebtedness incurred for the
purposes described in Subsection (3)(e)(i).
(f)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the allocation to aeronautical
operations of the Department of Transportation shall be used as provided in
the Aeronautics Restricted Account created by Section 72-2-126.
(4) (a)  The commission shall require reports and returns from distributors,
retail dealers, and users in order to enable the commission and the Department
of Transportation to allocate the revenue to be credited to:
(i)  the Aeronautics Restricted Account created by Section 72-2-126; and
(ii)  the separate accounts of individual airports.
(b) (i)  Except as provided by Subsection (4)(b)(ii), any unexpended amount
remaining in the account of any publicly used airport on the first day of
January, April, July, and October shall be paid to the authority operating the
airport.
(ii)  Aviation fuel tax allocated to any airport owned and operated by a city
of the first class shall be paid to the city treasurer on the first day of
each month.
(c)  The state treasurer shall place aviation fuel tax collected on fuel sold
at places other than publicly used airports in the Aeronautics Restricted
Account created by Section 72-2-126.
